Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.610

Comprehensive school counseling programs—Implementation.

(1) The comprehensive school counseling program required by RCW 28A.320.600 must be implemented by school counselors or other educational staff associates for the purpose of guiding students in academic pursuits, career planning, and social-emotional learning.

(2) School counselors or other educational staff associates assigned to implement comprehensive school counseling programs must allocate at least 80 percent of their work time providing direct and indirect services to benefit students, as aligned with standards developed by a national organization representing school counselors. Tasks such as coordinating and monitoring student testing, supervising students at lunch and recess, and assuming the duties of other noncounseling staff are not direct or indirect services.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Direct services" are in-person interactions between school counselors or other educational staff associates assigned to implement comprehensive school counseling programs and students that help students improve achievement, attendance, and discipline. Examples include, but are not limited to, instruction, appraisal, advisement, and counseling.

(b) "Indirect services" are provided on behalf of students as a result of interactions with others by school counselors or educational staff associates assigned to implement comprehensive school counseling programs that allow school counselors or educational staff associates to enhance student achievement and promote equity and access for all students. Examples include, but are not limited to, collaboration, consultation, and referrals.

(c) "Work time" means the portion of an employee's contracted hours for which they are contracted to perform the duties of a school counselor or other educational staff associate assignment.

[ 2021 c 174 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2021 c 174: See note following RCW 28A.320.600.